Massachusetts, session 194th, S404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 85V of said chapter 231 is hereby amended by inserting after clause 
(iii) the following clause:- 
(iv) a civil action for sexual abuse of a minor, as that term is defined in section 4C½ of 
chapter 260. 
SECTION 2. Section 85W of said chapter 231 is hereby amended by inserting after the 
word “automobile”, in line 20, the following words:- 
or in a civil action for sexual abuse of a minor, as that term is defined in section 4C½ of 
chapter 260 

of 2 9  SECTION 3. Subsection (j) of section 10 of chapter 258 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (4), the 
following paragraph:- 
(5) any claim by or on behalf of a person who alleges that he was sexually abused as a 
child, as that term is defined in section 4C of chapter 260.  
SECTION 4. Section 2 of chapter 258C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (b), the following subsection:- 
(b1) In the case of a claimant who was sexually abused as a minor, such good cause shall 
include the report of a duly licensed mental health professional stating an opinion that the 
claimant did not make the connection between the sexual abuse and the harm suffered by the 
claimant at the time the abuse occurred, and that claimant's failure to make the connection was 
consistent with the typical responses by such victims of childhood sexual abuse. 
SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 5 of said chapter 258C is hereby amended by 
inserting after section paragraph (1) the following paragraph:- 
(1A) In the case of a claimant who was sexually abused as a minor, said three years shall 
commence to run when the claimant first makes the connection between the sexual abuse and the 
harm suffered by the claimant as a result. The report of a duly licensed mental health 
professional stating an opinion as to the date when the claimant first made the connection 
between the sexual abuse and the harm suffered by the claimant, and that the claimant's failure to 
make the connection prior to that date was consistent with the typical responses by such victims 
of childhood sexual abuse, shall be prima facie evidence in all proceedings under this chapter.